Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7085.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-72 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-72. Special plate for Mr. Potato Head.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a
special motor vehicle registration plate commemorating the fiftieth (50th) anniversary of Mr. Potato
Head. The plate shall bear the designation “Mr. Potato Head — 50th anniversary” and shall bear
the seal of the state imprinted on it. The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration
number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same
manner as the original registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for
the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be
carried in the vehicle, in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate shall be in effect for
the special plate.
(b) A special automobile or commercial commemorative Mr. Potato Head — 50th
anniversary plate shall be issued upon application using forms furnished by the administrator upon
payment in addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, and a service charge
of forty dollars ($40.00) for each issue. The service charge shall be paid to the administrator prior
to the administrator’s acceptance of the application. Twenty dollars ($20.00) of the service charge
shall be paid to the Rhode Island Community Food Bank and twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be
allocated to the division of motor vehicles for its costs in manufacturing and distributing the special

plates.
(c) Any current registration for “Mr. Potato Head- 50th anniversary" plates may remain as
an authorized and permitted registration provided the registration remains continuously renewed.
Any lapse, nonrenewal, revocation or loss or destruction of the plate or the registration for the plates
shall result in the permanent nonregistration and nonrenewal of registration for the plates. The “Mr.
Potato Head- 50th anniversary” plates shall not be transferred or registered to any other or
subsequent vehicle of the registered owner or the registered owner’s family or relatives.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003920
========
LC003920 - Page 2 of 3